Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-4] License suspension, revocation,
or refusal to renew. (a) The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse
to renew the license of any licensee if the commissioner finds that:

(1) There was any material misrepresentation in the
application for the license;

(2) The licensee or any officer, partner, member, or
director has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices, is subject to a
final administrative action, or is otherwise shown to be untrustworthy or
incompetent to act as a licensee;

(3) The provider demonstrates a pattern of
unreasonably withholding payments to policy owners;

(4) The licensee no longer meets the requirements for
initial licensure;

(5) The licensee or any officer, partner, member, or
director has been convicted of a felony, or of any misdemeanor of which
criminal fraud is an element or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere with
respect to any felony or any misdemeanor of which criminal fraud or moral
turpitude is an element, regardless of whether a judgment of conviction has
been entered by the court;

(6) The provider has entered into any life settlement
contract that has not been approved pursuant to this chapter;

(7) The provider has failed to honor contractual
obligations set out in a life settlement contract;

(8) The provider has assigned, transferred, or
pledged a settled policy to a person other than a provider licensed in this State,
a purchaser, an accredited investor or qualified institutional buyer as defined
respectively in Rule 501 of Regulation D or Rule 144A of the federal Securities
Act of 1933, as amended, a financing entity, a special purpose entity, or a
related provider trust; or

(9) The licensee or any officer, partner, member, or
key management personnel has violated this chapter.

(b) Before the commissioner may deny a license
application or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of any licensee
under this chapter, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing in accordance with
chapter 91. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next